Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2908
Director; duties.

Consistent with the purposes and objectives of the Dispute Resolution Act and in consultation with the council, the director shall:

(1) Approve centers which meet requirements for approval;

(2) Develop and supervise a uniform system of reporting and collecting statistical data from approved centers;

(3) Develop and supervise a uniform system of evaluating approved centers;

(4) Prepare a yearly budget for the implementation of the act and distribute funds to approved centers;

(5) Develop and administer guidelines for a sliding scale of fees to be charged by approved centers;

(6) Develop, initiate, or approve curricula and training sessions for mediators and staff of approved centers and of courts;

(7) Establish volunteer training programs;

(8) Promote public awareness of the restorative justice and dispute resolution process;

(9) Apply for and receive funds from public and private sources for carrying out the purposes and obligations of the act;

(10) Develop and supervise a uniform system to create and maintain a roster of approved centers and victim youth conferencing and other restorative justice facilitators who are affiliated with approved centers. The roster shall be made available to courts and county attorneys;

(11) Enhance the sustainability of approved centers;

(12) Support approved centers in the implementation of restorative justice programs;

(13) Coordinate the development and implementation of new restorative justice programs;

(14) Develop and administer a uniform system for reporting and collecting statistical data regarding restorative justice programs from approved centers;

(15) Develop and administer a uniform system for evaluating restorative justice programs administered by approved centers;

(16) Develop and administer a uniform system for evaluating quality assurance and fidelity to established restorative justice principles;

(17) Coordinate software and data management system quality assurance for the office and the approved centers;

(18) Coordinate restorative justice training sessions for restorative justice facilitators and staff of approved centers and the courts;

(19) Review and provide analyses of state and federal laws and policies and judicial branch policies relating to restorative justice programs for juvenile populations and adult populations;

(20) Promote public awareness of the restorative justice and dispute resolution process under the Dispute Resolution Act; and

(21) Seek and identify funds from public and private sources for carrying out new and ongoing restorative justice programs.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 7.